test/src/dict-gt-yamls/N-caallim_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



  Noun - čäällim: # 1B v-g, ääll-›äl
    čäällim+N+Sg+Nom: čäällim
    čäällim+N+Sg+Gen: čäällim
    čäällim+N+Sg+Acc: čäällim
    čäällim+N+Sg+Ill: čäḷimân
    čäällim+N+Sg+Loc: čäḷimist
    čäällim+N+Sg+Com: čäḷimáin
    čäällim+N+Sg+Abe: čäällimttáá
    čäällim+N+Ess: čäḷimin
    čäällim+N+Par: čäḷimid
    čäällim+N+Pl+Nom: čäḷimeh
    čäällim+N+Pl+Gen: čäḷimij
    čäällim+N+Pl+Acc: čäḷimijd
    čäällim+N+Pl+Ill: čäḷimáid
    čäällim+N+Pl+Loc: čälimijn
    čäällim+N+Pl+Com: čäḷimijguin
    čäällim+N+Pl+Abe: čäḷimijttáá
    
